Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 468A.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Department of Environ-
mental Quality, the Environmental Quality Commission or a regional  air quality control au-
thority formed under ORS  468A.105 may not adopt or enforce any rule or standard that
requires a person to operate a human or animal crematory incinerator at  a temperature
greater than 1,600 degrees Fahrenheit.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3729 (HB 3729-INTRO) Page 1